Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.02
Subpoena for witness; authorized.

The chairperson of the commission shall, on application of any person having a cause or any matter pending before it, issue a subpoena for a witness or witnesses under the seal of the commission, inserting all the names required by the applicant in one subpoena.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 53.